src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
Isaíes/XyGaYs
Severín/XyYs
abrigada/SfGaYs
aceutar/VpGc st:aceutar
acometedor/AaApGaYs
aereu/AdApGaYs
afartu/AaApGaYs
afatador/AaApGaYs
afenar/VpGc st:afenar
afinamientu/SmGaYs
agrión/SmGaYs
alcoholismu/SmGaYs
alforxar/VpGc st:alforxar
alluezu/SmGaYs
alministrativu/AaApGaYsSa
almirante/SbGaYs
alusivu/AaApGaYs
alverbial/AaApGaYs
ambulatoriu/SmGaYs
amnésicu/AaApGaYs
amormiyar/VpGc st:amormiyar
anfiboloxía/SfGaYs
anterior/AfApGaYs
antárticu/AaApGaYs
apercontiar/VpGc st:apercontiar
apóstata/SiGaYs
arciprestalgu/SmGaYs
argadellador/AaApGaYs
arqueólogu/SaGaYs
arranganar/VpGc st:arranganar
arrotu/AaApGaYs
artísticu/AaApGaYs
asosañar/VpGc st:asosañar
autodidacta/SiGaYs
autonomía/SfGaYs
aventanar/VpGc st:aventanar
ayudante/SbGaYs
babuyera/SfYs
barraqueru/SaYs
bedel/SbYs
bergüétanu/SmYs
billarista/SiYs
bilordieru/AaApYs
bimbu/AaApYs
brañeru/AaApYsSa
brenca/SfYs
campasola/SiYs
canastriyu/SmYs
candidatu/SaYs
capataz/SbYs
carabina/SfYs
cardín/AaApYs
caretu/AaApYsSm
carranquete/AcApYs
cavilar/VpGc st:cavilar
cayemos/Ll st:cayer
censor/SaYs
chapacumen/SiYs
chaparrete/AbApYs
chaval/SbYs
chinela/SfYs
ciebu/SmYs
citerior/AfApYs
ciudadanu/AaApYsSa
cliente/SbYs
coetaneu/AdApYs
color/SiYs
coloráu/AaApYs
comandante/SbYs
combatiente/AaApYs
comerciante/AbApYs
conserxe/SbYs
conseyeru/AaApYsSa
contemporaneu/AdApYs
contrariedá/SfYs
controlador/AaApYsSi
coríu/SeYs
croquis/Ys
críu/SeYs
cuestor/SaYs
cupletista/SiYs
cutaneu/AdApYs
cáusticu/AaApYs
cómicu/AaApYsSa
danzar/VpGc st:danzar
dedada/SfYs
desenredar/VpGc st:desenredar
devotu/SaYs
dibuxante/SbYs
doctorandu/SiYs
dual/AaApYs
día/V1V2LlAp st:dir
eficaz/AaApGaYs
elegante/AaApGaYs
embelecu/SmGaYs
embusteru/AaApGaYsSa
empañar/VpGc st:empañar
empotradura/SfGaYs
endiosamientu/SmGaYs
engorollar/VpGc st:engorollar
entruénzanu/SmGaYs
ermitañu/SaGaYs
esbarrocar/VpGc st:esbarrocar
escandalosu/AaApGaYs
escaparatista/SiGaYs
escarbáu/AaApGaYs
escarzueyu/SmGaYs
escordeladura/SfGaYs
esfervollar/VpGc st:esfervollar
esgonxáu/AaApGaYs
esnalada/SfGaYs
esplayar/VpGc st:esplayar
esplañida/SfGaYs
espontaneu/AdApGaYs
esterior/AfApGaYsSm
estorsionador/AaApGaYs
estrapalandráu/AaApGaYs
estrañu/AaApGaYs
etereu/AdApGaYs
fagotista/SiYs
fai/LlV1 st:facer
fatal/AaApYs
fecha/SfYs
foyeru/SaYs
fracasar/VpGc st:fracasar
franciscanu/AaApYs
frenopáticu/AaApYs
fíu/SeYs
gafencia/SfYs
gayumbu/AaApYs
gobernante/AbApYs
grandor/SiYs
guaḥe/AbApYs
güéspede/SbYs
hemeroteca/SfGaYs
heteroxeneu/AdApGaYs
hexagonal/AaApGa
hidrofobia/SfGaYs
hindi/AaGaYs
historiador/SaGaYs
homoxeneu/AdApGaYs
humorista/SiGaYs
incomprensión/SfGaYs
inferior/AfApGaYs
instantaneu/AdApGaYs
interior/AfApGaYsSm
intervieno/G1 st:intervenir
inventu/SmGaYs
irracionalidá/SfGaYs
isomorfu/AaApGaYs
kantianu/AaApYs
llanchada/SfYs
llande/SiYs
llorimisquiar/VpGc st:llorimisquiar
luminotécnicu/SaYs
manditu/AaApYs
manierista/AaApYs
manifestante/SiYs
manifestura/SfYs
manueca/SfYs
marchante/SbYs
mayor/AfApYs
mediterraneu/AdApYs
moclán/SaYs
momentaneu/AdApYs
monigote/SbYs
mordata/SfYs
mosegu/AaApYs
moñu/AaApYs
munín/AaApYsSi
nacenciu/SmYs
odia/G1 st:odiar
odie/G1 st:odiar
odio/G0 st:odiar
oigo/Ll st:oyer
orientalista/SiGaYs
oyeru/SmGaYs
palancana/SfYs
pandereteru/AaApYsSa
paniegu/AaApYs
papilar/AaApYs
pastoriar/VpGc st:pastoriar
pañuca/Ys
peral/SiYs
peñerica/SfYs
planimétricu/AaApYs
plizcañador/AaApYs
posterior/AfApYs
potentáu/SaYs
presencia/SfYs
presidente/SbYs
prunal/SfYs
pus/SiYs
raigo/Ll st:raer
rapacete/AcApYs
raspa/AaApYs
reconvertir/VqGc st:reconvertir
reguilete/AcApYsSm
relixosu/AaApYsSa
remolina/SfYs
repicapierna/SfYs
riamos/Ll st:rir
rieran/Ll st:rir
rieren/Ll st:rir
riestis/Ll st:rir
ruinosu/AaApYs
sabotiador/AaApYs
santiguar/VpGc st:santiguar
segadora/SfYs
siempreviva/SfYs
simultaneu/AdApYs
sirviente/SbYs
sointendente/SiYs
sollastre/AbApYs
sonsu/AaApYs
suave/AaApYs
sucedaneu/AdApYs
sultán/SaYs
superior/AfApYs
tipu/SmYs
traemos/Ll st:traer
trafulleru/AaApYs
trapicheru/AaApYs
travesalista/SiYs
trayemos/Ll st:trayer
trayida/SfYs
trefilar/VpGc st:trefilar
téunicu/AaApYsSa
tíu/SeYs
unvio/LlGa st:unviar
vacíu/AeApYsSe
vean/Ll st:ver
vemos/Ll st:ver
verduleru/SaYs
veáis/LlV9V0 st:ver
viaxante/SbYs
viera/Ll st:ver
viere/Ll st:ver
vieron/Ll st:ver
visible/AaApYs
viéra/LlXxV1V2V3V4 st:ver
viéren/LlXxV1V2 st:ver
voluntariegu/AaApYs
véa/LlXxV1V2V3V4 st:ver
vés/LlXxV8 st:ver
xastre/SbYs
xefe/SbYs
xeómetra/SiYs
xudíu/AeApYsSe
xuez/SbYs
yelseru/SaYs
zoquete/AbApYsSm
áscuara/SfGaYs
ñisgatu/SmYs
